Utah statutes.
78B-13-106.   Binding force of child custody determination.

A child custody determination made by a court of this state that had jurisdiction under this chapter binds all persons who have been served in accordance with the laws of this state or notified in accordance with Section 78B-13-108 or who have submitted to the jurisdiction of the court, and who have been given an opportunity to be heard.  The determination is conclusive as to them as to all decided issues of law and fact except to the extent the determination is modified.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

